District of Columbia statutes.
29A-414

Repealed

Foreign professional corporations; requirement for admission to transact business in District; certificate of authority.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 92-180, § 14
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1114.
1981 Ed., § 29-614.
2001 Ed., § 29-414.